Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2316
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon powers which the corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice, or approval shall be required for the organization of the corporation or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security for the bonds or instrument, except as provided in the act, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, but nothing in the act shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over any properties of the corporation or to impair any power of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 17;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 16.